Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.570

Conservation area acquisition and maintenance.

The legislative authority of each county may acquire a fee simple interest, or lesser interest, in conservation areas in the county and may maintain the conservation areas. The conservation areas may be acquired and maintained with moneys obtained from the excise tax under RCW 82.46.070, or any other moneys available for such purposes.

As used in this section, the term "conservation area" means land and water that has environmental, agricultural, aesthetic, cultural, scientific, historic, scenic, or low-intensity recreational value for existing and future generations, and includes, but is not limited to, open spaces, wetlands, marshes, aquifer recharge areas, shoreline areas, natural areas, and other lands and waters that are important to preserve flora and fauna.

[ 1990 1st ex.s. c 5 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1990 1st ex.s. c 5: "The purpose of this act is to provide a mechanism for the acquisition and maintenance of conservation areas through an orderly process that is approved by the voters of a county. The authorities provided in this act are supplemental, and shall not be construed to limit otherwise existing authorities." [ 1990 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1.]